Illinois, session 104th, SB178.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 235 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/235 new)7    Sec. 235. Credit for soundproofing of residential homes.8    (a) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 92025, each taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the tax 10imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an 11amount equal to the amount paid by the taxpayer during the 12taxable year for the purpose of purchasing materials, labor, 13and professional services to soundproof a residential home 14located at an eligible address against aircraft noise 15generated by an airport governed by the provisions of the 16Permanent Noise Monitoring Act. In order to be eligible for 17the credit under this Section, the soundproofing work must be 18carried out in accordance with the requirements of the 19Illinois Residential Building Code Act. 20    (b) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce a 21taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 22credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess may 23be carried forward and applied to the tax liability for the 5   SB0178- 2 -LRB104 07331 HLH 17371 b1taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax credit 2shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 3liability. If there are credits for more than one year that are 4available to offset liability, the earlier credit shall be 5applied first. 6    (c) As used in this Section, "eligible address" means any 7address located (i) within the 65 DNL Build-out Contour for 8O'Hare International Airport, as defined by rules adopted by 9the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) within an 10alternative 65 CNEL Build-out Contour for O'Hare International 11Airport, with annual CNEL units as defined in subsection (a-3) 12of Section 5 of the Permanent Noise Monitoring Act, or (iii) 13not more than 20 miles east or west and not more than 3 miles 14north or south of an airport runway aligned in an east-west 15direction and located at O'Hare International Airport. 16    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 17250.  18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 19becoming law.